Illinois, session 104th, SB3100.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5adding Article 20 to Chapter III as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/Ch. III Art. 20 heading new)7ARTICLE 20. TAMMS MINIMUM SECURITY UNIT TASK FORCE 8    (730 ILCS 5/3-20-1 new)9    Sec. 3-20-1. Tamms Minimum Security Unit Task Force.10    (a) The Tamms Minimum Security Unit Task Force is created 11to study the repurposing of the Tamms Minimum Security Unit.12    (b) The Task Force shall study the subject of a practical, 13efficient, and beneficial repurposing of the Tamms Minimum 14Security Unit and its property for the benefit of the public, 15including the possibility of providing mental health services, 16health services, public safety and law enforcement training, 17fire services, medical training, or any other option for 18repurposing that the Task Force deems appropriate. The 19membership of the Task Force shall include:20        (1) one member to serve as chair, appointed by the 21    Lieutenant Governor;22        (2) one member of the House of Representatives,   SB3100- 2 -LRB104 18903 RLC 32348 b1    appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives;2        (3) one member of the House of Representatives, 3    appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of 4    Representatives;5        (4) one member of the Senate, appointed by the 6    President of the Senate;7        (5) one member of the Senate, appointed by the Senate 8    Minority Leader;9        (6) the Director of Corrections or his or her 10    designee;11        (7) one member of a labor organization representing a 12    plurality of Department of Corrections employees, 13    nominated by that labor organization and appointed by the 14    Director of Corrections;15        (8) one member representing Shawnee Community College, 16    appointed by the President of Shawnee Community College;17        (9) one member representing Southern Illinois 18    University, appointed by the President of Southern 19    Illinois University;20        (10) the mayor of Tamms, Illinois; and21        (11) one member representing Alexander County, 22    appointed by the Chairman of the Alexander County Board.23    (c) Each member of the Task Force shall serve without 24compensation. The Task Force shall meet 2 times per year or at 25the call of the Chairperson. The Department of Corrections 26shall provide administrative support to the Task Force.  SB3100- 3 -LRB104 18903 RLC 32348 b1    (d) The Task Force shall submit a report to the Governor 2and the General Assembly on or before December 31, 2027 with 3its recommendations and is dissolved on January 1, 2028.4    (e) This Section is repealed on January 1, 2029.  5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.